Utah statutes.
53-3-106.   Disposition of revenues under this chapter -- Restricted account created -- Uses as provided by appropriation -- Nonlapsing.

(1)  There is created within the Transportation Fund a restricted account known as the "Department of Public Safety Restricted Account."

(2)  The account consists of money generated from the following revenue sources:

(a)  all money received under this chapter;

(b)  administrative fees received according to the fee schedule authorized under this chapter and Section 63J-1-504;

(c)  beginning on January 1, 2013, money received in accordance with Section 41-1a-1201; and

(d)  any appropriations made to the account by the Legislature.

(3) (a)  The account shall earn interest.

(b)  All interest earned on account money shall be deposited in the account.

(4)  The expenses of the department in carrying out this chapter shall be provided for by legislative appropriation from this account.

(5)  The amount in excess of $45 of the fees collected under Subsection 53-3-105(24) shall be appropriated by the Legislature from this account to the department to implement the provisions of Section 53-1-117, except that of the amount in excess of $45, $40 shall be deposited in the State Laboratory Drug Testing Account created in Section 26-1-34.

(6)  All money received under Subsection 41-6a-1406(6)(b)(ii) shall be appropriated by the Legislature from this account to the department to implement the provisions of Section 53-1-117.

(7)  Beginning in fiscal year 2009-10, the Legislature shall appropriate $100,000 annually from the account to the state medical examiner appointed under Section 26-4-4 for use in carrying out duties related to highway crash deaths under Subsection 26-4-7(1).

(8)  The division shall remit the fees collected under Subsection 53-3-105(28) to the Bureau of Criminal Identification to cover the costs for the services the Bureau of Criminal Identification provides under Section 53-3-205.5.

(9) (a)  Beginning on January 1, 2013, the Legislature shall appropriate all money received in the account under Section 41-1a-1201 to the Utah Highway Patrol Division for field operations.

(b)  The Legislature may appropriate additional money from the account to the Utah Highway Patrol Division for law enforcement purposes.

(10)  Appropriations to the department from the account are nonlapsing.

